Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-511
Registered agent.

(a) The registered agent in this state for a series limited liability company is the registered agent in this state for each protected series of the company.

(b) Before delivering a protected-series designation to the Secretary of State for filing, a limited liability company shall agree with a registered agent that the agent will serve as the registered agent in this state for both the company and the protected series.

(c) A person that signs a protected-series designation delivered to the Secretary of State for filing affirms as a fact that the limited liability company on whose behalf the designation is delivered has complied with subsection (b) of this section.

(d) A person that ceases to be the registered agent for a series limited liability company ceases to be the registered agent for each protected series of the company.

(e) A person that ceases to be the registered agent for a protected series of a series limited liability company, other than as a result of the termination of the protected series, ceases to be the registered agent of the company and any other protected series of the company.

(f) Except as otherwise agreed by a series limited liability company and its registered agent, the agent is not obligated to distinguish between a process, notice, demand, or other record concerning the company and a process, notice, demand, or other record concerning a protected series of the company.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 12.